Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon State University Extension Service shall, in consultation
with the Department of Consumer and Business Services, establish a basic lumber grading
training pilot program to be offered annually  through the extension service. Establishment
of the pilot program under this subsection must include a determination of the:
(a) General requirements for successfully completing the pilot program.
(b) Requirements for initial certification and recertification.
(c) Content  of the pilot program. At minimum, the content of the pilot program must
include:
(A) A minimum of eight instructional hours, including hands-on practice with  physical
lumber samples; and
(B) Instruction  in regionally relevant species identification, moisture content consider-
ations and visual grading criteria for structural dimension lumber.
(d) Certification requirements for instructors teaching the pilot  program. At minimum,
to be certified instructors must:
(A) Demonstrate substantial expertise in visual lumber grading through:
(i) A valid grader  certification from an organization that administers an accreditation
program for the grademarking of lumber produced under a system that is the basis  for the
sale and purchase of softwood lumber;
(ii) Seven years of professional experience in lumber  grading, quality control or wood
products education, with demonstrated knowledge of visual  grading rules applicable to re-
gionally relevant species; or
(iii) Equivalent qualifications approved by the extension service based  on professional
history, training and relevant industry involvement; and
(B) Maintain continued competency through industry  involvement, refresher coursework
or other methods approved by the extension service.
(2) The  extension service shall issue certifications and recertifications to those individ-
uals who have successfully completed the pilot program.
(3) An individual who  holds an initial certification as having successfully completed the
pilot program must be recertified every five years.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Self-graded lumber” means lumber graded  by an individual who is certified to grade
lumber through the pilot program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1061 (SB 1061-B) Page 1
(b) “Third-party graded lumber” means lumber  bearing a valid grade stamp from a
grading agency accredited by an organization that administers an accreditation program for
the grademarking of lumber produced under a system that is the basis for the sale  and
purchase of softwood lumber.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall establish by rule a  process
by which a builder, designer or owner may use lumber that is tested and approved by an in-
dividual who is certified under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The process established under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May not  establish, create or accept any new grade or design value as part of the
state’s building code.
(b) Shall permit the use of self-graded lumber  only for structures that are subject to the
Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
(c) Shall require that the intent of a  builder, design professional, contractor and home-
owner to use self-graded  lumber must be disclosed in writing at the time of the building
permit application. Disclosure under this paragraph must be made to an inspector who is li-
censed by the department  or a municipality administering and enforcing a building inspection
program. The writing required under this paragraph must be filed with the county clerk, who
shall make the writing a part of the permanent deed record of the property.
(d) Shall include that  the lumber used for self-graded lumber must originate from a
known source, requiring a documented relationship or permit between the lumber  owner and
the purchaser of the milled lumber.
(4)(a) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer  or grader of third-party graded
lumber may be held liable in whole or in part for a failure of or  defect in self-graded lumber
incorporated in the same structure.
(b) This subsection applies  only to structures permitted under subsection (3)(b) of this
section in which self-graded lumber is incorporated.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2033.
Passed by Senate April 28, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1061 (SB 1061-B) Page 2